District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2130

Second or subsequent conviction under §§ 3-2120 to 3-2122 and 3-2129

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(a), 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 2-1201 to 2-1233.